District of Columbia statutes.
42-3403.03

Relocation services.

The Mayor shall provide relocation assistance to low-income tenants who move from a housing accommodation which is converted into a condominium or cooperative. The Mayor shall provide service in the manner required by § 6-333.01.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 303(a), 27 DCR 2975
1981 Ed., § 45-1622.
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.